District of Columbia statutes.
29-1203.07

Power to hold property; title to trust property.

A statutory trust may hold or take title to property in its own name or in the name of a trustee in the trustee’s capacity as trustee, whether in an active, passive, or custodial capacity.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 307 of the Uniform Statutory Trust Entity Act.